Utah statutes.
17-11-2.   Initiating petitions -- Limitation.

Whenever there shall be presented to the county legislative body of any county a petition signed by qualified electors of such county, in number equal to a majority of the votes cast at the preceding general election, praying for the submission of the question of the removal of the county seat, it shall be the duty of the county legislative body to submit the question of such removal at the next general election to the qualified electors of such county; and such election shall be conducted and the returns canvassed in all respects as provided by law for the conducting of general elections and canvassing the returns thereof. A proposition of removal of the county seat shall not be submitted in the same county more than once in four years, or within four years from the time that any such proposition has been theretofore submitted.

